Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.380

Use of association's facilities—Disposition of proceeds.

An association may use or employ any of its facilities for any purpose: PROVIDED, That the proceeds arising from such use and employment go to reduce the cost of operation for its members; but the fishery products of nonmembers shall not be dealt in to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it for its members.

[ 1959 c 312 s 38.]